Colorado, session 2026A, HB1096.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) The public policy of the state of Colorado promotes access to
medical care for all Colorado citizens by encouraging innovative,
cost-saving arrangements;
(b) Direct primary health-care providers use a model of
health-care delivery based on a periodic fee for a specified period of time,
rather than a fee-for-service arrangement financed through health
insurance;
(c) Direct primary care services represent an option that can
improve access to affordable primary care services, increasing the health
and well-being of patients;
(d) Although direct primary care services are not reimbursable by
medicaid, a medicaid member who utilizes a direct primary health-care
provider is still able to use their medicaid benefits for services not
provided by the medicaid member's direct primary health-care provider;
and
(e) Patients in Colorado, including those on medicaid, have the
right to choose the providers that best fit their unique health needs and
have the ability to access health-care providers that are closer to home,
-2- 1096

when available. Access to timely and appropriate primary care is a crucial
component of ensuring the health and well-being of our communities,
particularly in rural and frontier areas where access to clinics, providers,
and other resources may be limited.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that Coloradans
enrolled in medicaid must have the option to access direct primary
health-care providers, and direct primary health-care providers must be
allowed to opt-in to providing services to medicaid patients.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-23-101, amend the
introductory portion; and add (2.5) as follows:
6-23-101. Definitions.
As used in this section ARTICLE 23, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(2.5) "MEMBER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
25.5-1-103.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 6-23-106 as
follows:
6-23-106. Direct primary care - medicaid members - federal
authorization - report - definition - repeal.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "ORDERING, PRESCRIBING, OR REFERRING PROVIDER" MEANS A
PHYSICIAN OR AN ELIGIBLE NON-PHYSICIAN PRACTITIONER ENROLLED IN
THE COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM WHO ORDERS TESTS,
SERVICES, OR MEDICATIONS FOR A MEMBER BUT DOES NOT BILL THE
COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FOR THE SERVICES DIRECTLY.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING
SHALL NOT PROHIBIT A MEMBER FROM PURCHASING PRIMARY CARE
-3- 1096

SERVICES OR ENTERING INTO A DIRECT PRIMARY CARE AGREEMENT.
(3) A DIRECT PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER SHALL NOT
SUBMIT A FEE-FOR-SERVICE CLAIM FOR PRIMARY CARE SERVICES
RENDERED TO MEDICAID FOR REIMBURSEMENT.
(4) A MEMBER WHO PURCHASES PRIMARY CARE SERVICES FROM A
DIRECT PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER OR ENTERS INTO A DIRECT
PRIMARY CARE AGREEMENT WITH A DIRECT PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE
PROVIDER MUST SIGN A DOCUMENT PROVIDED BY THE DIRECT PRIMARY
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER ACKNOWLEDGING THE FOLLOWING:
(a) THE DIRECT PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER IS ENROLLED IN
THE COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ONLY AS AN ORDERING,
PRESCRIBING, AND REFERRING PROVIDER AND THE DIRECT PRIMARY
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER DOES NOT ACCEPT MEDICAID PAYMENTS FOR THE
SERVICES RENDERED;
(b) THE MEMBER MAY NOT SUBMIT A CLAIM FOR MEDICAID
REIMBURSEMENT FOR PRIMARY CARE SERVICES RENDERED BY THE DIRECT
PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER PURSUANT TO THE DIRECT PURCHASE
OF PRIMARY CARE SERVICES OR AS A RESULT OF THE DIRECT PRIMARY
CARE AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO BETWEEN THE DIRECT PRIMARY
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER AND THE MEMBER; AND
(c) THE MEMBER RETAINS THE RIGHT TO RECEIVE PRIMARY CARE
SERVICES FROM A PRIMARY CARE PROVIDER WHO IS ENROLLED IN THE
COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(5) A DIRECT PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER WHO PROVIDES
PRIMARY CARE SERVICES TO A MEMBER WHO DIRECTLY PURCHASES
PRIMARY CARE SERVICES FROM THE DIRECT PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE
PROVIDER OR AS A RESULT OF THE DIRECT PRIMARY CARE AGREEMENT
-4- 1096

ENTERED INTO BETWEEN THE DIRECT PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER
AND THE MEMBER MUST ENROLL IN THE COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM AS AN ORDERING, PRESCRIBING, OR REFERRING PROVIDER TO
ENSURE ORDERS, PRESCRIPTIONS, AND REFERRALS FOR MEMBERS ARE
ACCEPTED AND PROCESSED APPROPRIATELY THROUGH THE COLORADO
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING
SHALL SEEK ANY FEDERAL AUTHORIZATION NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SECTION.
(7) (a) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 15, 2028, A DIRECT PRIMARY
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER WHO PROVIDES PRIMARY CARE SERVICES TO A
MEMBER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT:
(I) THE NUMBER OF MEMBERS THE DIRECT PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE
PROVIDER HAS SERVED FROM AUGUST 12, 2026, TO NOVEMBER 1, 2028;
AND
(II) WHETHER THE DIRECT PRIMARY HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER WAS
ENROLLED IN THE COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM AND
DISENROLLED IN THE COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
BETWEEN AUGUST 12, 2026, AND NOVEMBER 1, 2028, AND STARTED
PROVIDING DIRECT PRIMARY CARE SERVICES TO MEMBERS DURING THAT
TIME.
(b) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, THE STATE DEPARTMENT
SHALL INCLUDE AS PART OF ITS "SMART ACT" PRESENTATION REQUIRED
BY SECTION 2-7-203 INFORMATION THAT IS READILY AVAILABLE ON:
(I) THE NUMBER OF MEMBERS SERVED BY DIRECT PRIMARY
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS AS REPORTED BY THE DIRECT PRIMARY
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS
-5- 1096

SECTION;
(II) THE NUMBER OF PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS WHO WERE
ENROLLED IN THE COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM AND
REPORTED TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a)
THAT THEY DISENROLLED IN THE COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM BETWEEN AUGUST 12, 2026, AND NOVEMBER 1, 2028;
(III) THE NUMBER OF PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS WHO WERE
ENROLLED IN THE COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM BEFORE
AUGUST 12, 2026; AND
(IV) THE NUMBER OF PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS WHO WERE
ENROLLED IN THE COLORADO MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM AFTER
NOVEMBER 1, 2028.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-301, amend
(1)(a)(III)(B) as follows:
25.5-4-301. Recoveries - overpayments - penalties - interest -
adjustments - liens - review or audit procedures - cash fund - rules -
definitions - repeal.
(1) (a) (III) (B) A member may enter into a written agreement
with a third party or provider, INCLUDING A DIRECT PRIMARY CARE
AGREEMENT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6-23-101, under which the member
agrees to pay for items provided or services rendered that are outside of
the network or plan protocols, INCLUDING DIRECT PRIMARY CARE
RETAINER PAYMENTS MADE ON BEHALF OF THE MEMBER. The member's
agreement to be personally liable for nonemergency, nonreimbursable
items must be recorded on forms approved by the state board and signed
and dated by both the member and the provider in advance of the services
being rendered.
-6- 1096

SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-7- 1096